California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(B) The occupant provides a written signature on the rental agreement consenting to receive lien notices by email.

(2) An owner may demonstrate actual delivery and receipt by any of the following:

(A) The occupant acknowledges receipt of the electronic transmission of the document by executing an electronic signature, which is defined as an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to, or logically associated with, an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(B) The document is
 delivered to the occupant’s email address, and there is evidence demonstrating that the occupant downloaded, printed, viewed, opened, or otherwise acknowledged receipt of the document.

(C) The document is transmitted to the occupant through an application on an internet website that is secured by password, biometric identifier, or other technology, and there is evidence demonstrating that the occupant logged into the application and viewed or otherwise acknowledged receipt of the document.

(D) The occupant acknowledges
 receipt of the electronic transmission of the document by replying to the email communication, and there is delivery path evidence that the reply email was sent from the occupant’s email address.

(3) If the owner is unable to demonstrate actual delivery and receipt pursuant to paragraph (2), the owner shall resend the notice by mail to the occupant’s last known mailing address in the manner originally specified by the underlying provisions of Section 21703 or 21705.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 369, Sec. 1.   (AB 498)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21712.3.

(a) (1) The owner shall give written notice to the occupant prior to the termination or nonrenewal of the rental agreement.

(2) The notice shall include a statement that the occupant may minimize the costs of storage by claiming any property remaining at the self-service storage facility within two days after the end of the rental agreement, and that the property may be sold, kept, destroyed, or disposed of if it is not claimed within the time period described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Where personal property remains at the self-service storage facility after the rental agreement has ended, the owner shall give written notice to the former occupant.

(2) The notice shall describe the property in a manner reasonably adequate to permit the former occupant to identify it. The notice shall advise the former occupant that rent may be charged before the property is returned, where the property may be claimed, and the
 date before which the claim must be made. The date specified in the notice shall be a date not less than 15 days after the notice is personally delivered or emailed, or, if mailed, not less than 18 days after the notice is deposited in the mail.

(3) The notice shall be personally delivered to the former occupant or sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the last known address of the former occupant and to the alternative address specified in subdivision (b) of Section 21712, or by email pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21712.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 91, Sec. 1.   (AB 1916)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21712.4.

(a) A notice given to the former occupant that is in substantially the following form satisfies the requirements of Section 21712.3:Notice of Right to Reclaim Abandoned PropertyTo: (Name of former occupant)(Address of former occupant)When the rental agreement ended for the storage space at (Address of self-service storage facility, including the space number, if any) ,the following personal property remained:(Insert description of the personal property)You may claim this property at (Address where property may be claimed).If you claim this property by ____ (insert date not less than 2 days after the end of the rental agreement), you may minimize the costs of storage.If you fail to claim this property by ____ (insert date not less than 2 days after the end of the rental agreement), unless you pay the rent for all the above-described property, and take possession of the property which you claim, not later than _______ (insert date not less than 15 days after notice is personally delivered or, if mailed, not less than 18 days after notice is deposited in the mail) this property may be sold, kept, destroyed, or disposed of pursuant to Business and Professions Code Section 21712.8.(Insert here the statement required by subdivision (b) of this section)Dated:
 _______(Signature of owner)(Type or print name of owner) (Telephone number) (Address)(b) The notice set forth in subdivision (a) shall also contain one of the following statements, as applicable:

(1) “If you fail to reclaim the property, it will be sold at a public sale after notice of the sale has been given by publication. You have the right to bid on the property at this sale. After the property is sold and the rent and costs of advertising and sale are deducted, the remaining money will be paid over to the county. You may claim the remaining money at any time within one year after the county receives the money.”

(2) “Because this property is believed to be worth less than $300, it may be kept, sold, destroyed, or otherwise disposed of without further notice if you fail to reclaim it within the time indicated
 above.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 91, Sec. 2.   (AB 1916)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21712.6.

The personal property described in the notice shall either be left at the self-service storage facility or be stored by the owner in a place of safekeeping until the owner either releases the property pursuant to Section 21712.7 or disposes of the property pursuant to Section 21712.8. The owner shall exercise reasonable care in storing the property, but the owner is not liable to the former occupant or any other person for any loss not caused by the owner’s deliberate or negligent act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 91, Sec. 3.   (AB 1916)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21712.7.

(a) The personal property described in the notice shall be released by the owner to the former occupant if the former occupant pays the rent and takes possession of the property not later than the date specified in the notice for taking possession.

(b) Where personal property is not released pursuant to subdivision (a), the owner shall release the personal property to the former occupant if the former occupant claims it prior to the time it is sold, kept, destroyed, or otherwise disposed of and pays the rent and reasonable costs of advertising and sale incurred prior to the time the property is released to the former occupant.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the owner shall release the personal property described in the notice to the former occupant and shall not require the former occupant to pay the cost of storage if the property remained in the storage facility and the former occupant reclaims the property within two days of termination of the rental agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 91, Sec. 4.   (AB 1916)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21712.8.

(a) If the personal property described in the notice is not released pursuant to Section 21712.7, it shall be sold at public sale by competitive bidding. However, if the owner reasonably believes that the total resale value of the property not released is less than three hundred dollars ($300), the owner may keep, sell, destroy, or otherwise dispose of the property in any manner. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the owner or former occupant from bidding on the property at the public sale.

(b) An advertisement of the sale shall be published pursuant to Section 21707.

(c) After deduction of the rent and costs of advertising and sale, any balance of the proceeds of the sale which is not claimed by the former occupant shall be paid into the treasury of the county in which the sale took place not later than 30 days after the date of sale. The former occupant may claim the balance within one year from the date of payment to the county by making an application to the county treasurer or other official designated by the county. If the county pays the balance or any part thereof to a claimant, neither the county nor any officer or employee thereof shall be liable to any other claimant as to the amount paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 91, Sec. 5.   (AB 1916)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21713.

This chapter shall not be construed to impair or affect the right of the parties to create additional rights, duties, and obligations in and by virtue of the rental agreement, including, but not limited to, the right to limit the value of the property the occupant may store in the storage space. The rights provided by this chapter shall be in addition to all other rights provided by law to a creditor against his or her
 debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 778, Sec. 4.   (AB 983)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21713.5.

(a) The owner of a self-service storage facility may assess a reasonable late payment fee if an occupant does not pay the entire amount of the rental fee specified in the rental agreement, subject to the following requirements:

(1) No late payment fee shall be assessed unless the rental fee remains unpaid for at least 10 days after the date specified in the rental agreement for payment of the rental fee.

(2) The
 amount of the late payment fee shall be specified in the occupant’s rental agreement.

(3) Only one late payment fee shall be assessed for each rental fee payment that is not paid on the date specified in the rental agreement.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “reasonable late payment fee” is one that does not exceed the following:

(1) Ten dollars ($10), if the rental agreement provides for monthly rent of sixty dollars ($60) or less.

(2) Fifteen dollars ($15), if the rental agreement provides for monthly rent greater than sixty dollars ($60), but less than one hundred dollars ($100).

(3) Twenty dollars ($20) or 15 percent of the monthly rental fee, whichever is greater, if the rental
 agreement provides for monthly rent of one hundred dollars ($100) or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 156, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

21714.

The provisions of this chapter shall only apply to rental agreements entered into, or extended, or renewed after the effective date of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21715.

All rental agreements entered into before the effective date of this chapter, and not extended or renewed after that date, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them, shall remain valid, and may be enforced or terminated in accordance with their terms or as permitted by any other statute or law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21715.2.

(a) A rental agreement shall disclose, in the manner described in subdivision (b), all of the following:

(1) The initial length and renewal term of the rental agreement.

(2) Whether the occupant has received a promotional or discounted rental fee.

(3) If the occupant has received a promotional or discounted rental fee, the duration of the promotional or discounted rental fee.

(4) Whether the rental fee is subject to change and, if so, the maximum rental fee that the owner could charge during the
 first 12 months following the date of the rental agreement.

(5) All required steps for the occupant to terminate the rental agreement and avoid future rental fees or other charges, including removing all personal property from the occupant’s storage space.

(6) Contact information for the owner.

(b) (1) The disclosures required by paragraphs (1) through (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be made on the first page of the rental agreement.

(2) The disclosures required by subdivision (a) shall be made in larger type than the surrounding text and in a manner that
 clearly calls attention to the language and meet either of the following criteria:

(A) The disclosures are in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text.

(B) The disclosures are set off from the surrounding text by symbols or by other marks.

(c) This section shall apply only to a rental agreement initially entered into on or after January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 353, Sec. 1.   (SB 709)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21715.5.

The owner may, upon the expiration of a period of at least 30 days from giving notice in writing to the occupant by personal delivery, by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the last known address of the occupant, or by email pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21712, change the terms of the rental agreement. The notice, upon the expiration of a period of at least 30 days from the date of service, shall in and of itself operate and be effectual to create and establish, as a part of the rental agreement, the terms, rents, and conditions specified in the notice, if the occupant continues to store personal property at the self-service storage facility after the notice takes effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 91, Sec. 6.   (AB 1916)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21716.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Copyrighted Performances of Musical Works [21750. - 21758.]

21750.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Copyright owner” means the owner of a copyright of a nondramatic musical work recognized and enforceable under the copyright laws of the United States pursuant to Title 17 of the United States Code, P. L. 94-553 (17 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.). “Copyright owner” does not include the owner of a copyright in a motion picture or audiovisual work, or in part of a motion picture or audiovisual work.

(b) “Performing rights society” means an association or corporation that licenses the public performance of nondramatic musical works on behalf of copyright owners, such as the American Society of Composers, Authors and Publishers (ASCAP), Broadcast Music, Inc. (BMI), and SESAC, Inc.

(c) “Proprietor” means the owner of a retail establishment, restaurant, inn, bar, tavern, or any other similar place of business or professional office located in this state in which the public may assemble and in which nondramatic musical works may be performed, broadcast, or otherwise transmitted for the enjoyment of the assembled members of the public.

(d) “Royalty” or “royalties” means the fees payable to a copyright owner or performing rights society for the public performance of a nondramatic musical work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21751.

No copyright owner or performing rights society may enter into, or offer to enter into, a contract for the payment of royalties by a proprietor unless at least 72 hours prior to the execution of that contract, it provides to the proprietor, in writing, the following:

(a) A schedule of the rates and terms of royalties under the contract.

(b) Notice that the proprietor is entitled to the information contained in subdivision (a) and Section 21751.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21751.5.

A performing rights society shall make available electronically to proprietors the most current available list of the members and affiliates represented by the performing rights society and the most current available list of no less than the performed works that the society licenses. A performing rights society may make additional information available to a proprietor at a reasonable cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21752.

A contract for the payment of royalties executed in this state shall:

(a) Be in writing.

(b) Be signed by the parties.

(c) Include at least the following information:

(1) The proprietor’s name and business address.

(2) The name and location of each place of business to which the contract applies.

(3) The duration of the contract.

(4) The schedule of rates and terms of the royalties to be collected under the contract, including any sliding scale or schedule for any increase or decrease of those rates for the duration of that contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21753.

(a) No representative or agent of a performing rights society may do any of the following:

(1) Discuss with the proprietor or the proprietor’s employee, a contract for payment of royalties by a proprietor or the use of copyrighted works by the proprietor, without first identifying himself or herself to the proprietor or the proprietor’s employees.

(2) Engage in any coercive conduct, act, or practice that is substantially disruptive of a proprietor’s business, or use or attempt to use a fraudulent act, as defined in Section 1572 of the Civil Code.

(3) Fail to comply with Section 21751, 21751.5, or 21752.

(b) This chapter does not prohibit a copyright owner or performing rights society from conducting investigations to determine the existence of music use by a proprietor or informing a proprietor of the proprietor’s obligation under Title 17 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21754.

A person who wilfully violates any of the provisions of this act is liable for a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21755.

A proprietor may bring an action or assert a counterclaim against a copyright owner or performing rights society to enjoin any violation of this chapter and to recover any damages sustained by the proprietor as a result of a violation of this chapter. If successful, the proprietor is entitled to recover treble damages, together with filing fees and reasonable costs of suit, in addition to any other legal or equitable relief.

If a proprietor prevails in a cause of action alleging a willful violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 21753, the prevailing proprietor shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21756.

The rights, remedies, and prohibitions accorded by this chapter are in addition to any other right, remedy, or prohibition accorded by law. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deny, abrogate, or impair any right, remedy, or prohibition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21757.

This chapter does not apply to contracts between copyright owners or performing rights societies and broadcasters licensed by the Federal Communications Commission. However, if a copyright owner or performing rights society is licensed by the Federal Communications Commission, this chapter applies to contracts between that copyright owner or performing rights society and a proprietor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21758.

This chapter does not apply to conduct engaged in while enforcing Section 653w of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.5. Optical Disc Identification [21800. - 21807.]

21800.

(a) Every person who manufactures an optical disc for commercial purposes shall permanently mark each manufactured optical disc with an identification mark that identifies the name of the manufacturer and the state in which the optical disc was manufactured or, alternatively, a unique identifying code that will allow law enforcement personnel to determine the name of the manufacturer and the state in which the optical disc was manufactured.

(b) The identification mark required by this section shall be affixed by molding, diestamping, etching, or other permanent method in a manner in which the identification mark is clearly visible without the aid of magnification or special devices
 to read the mark.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 421, Sec. 1.   (SB 550)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21801.

(a) No person who manufactures optical discs for commercial purposes shall (1) possess, own, control, or operate manufacturing equipment or any optical disc mold unless it has been adapted to apply the appropriate identification mark or unique identifying code in accordance with this chapter, or (2) make, possess, or adapt any optical disc mold for the purpose of applying to an optical disc a forged or false identification mark or identifying code, or any mark so similar to a manufacturer’s identification mark or identifying code as to be likely to deceive.

(b) Any manufacturing equipment, optical disc mold, or production part found on the premises of a commercial manufacturer shall for the purposes of
 this chapter be deemed to be in the possession of the manufacturer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 421, Sec. 3.   (SB 550)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21802.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Commercial purposes” means the manufacture of at least 10 of the same or different optical discs in a 180-day period by storing information on the disc for the purposes of resale by that person or others.

(b) “Manufacturer” means a person who replicates the physical optical disc or produces the master used in any optical disc replication process. It does not include a person who manufactures optical discs for internal use, testing, or review, or a person who manufactures blank optical discs.

(c) “Manufacturing
 equipment” means any machine, equipment, or device, including mastering equipment, used for the manufacture of optical discs or production parts in accordance with this chapter.

(d) “Mastering equipment” means any machine, equipment, or device used for the mastering of optical discs or production parts consisting of a signal processor and laser beam recorder or any other recorder, used to record data onto the glass or polymer master disc from which production parts are produced, or to record data directly onto a production part.

(e) “Optical disc” means a disc capable of being read by a laser or other light source on which data is stored in digital form. It includes, but is not limited to, discs known as CDs, DVDs, or related mastering source materials. It does not include blank optical discs.

(f) “Production part”
 means the item usually referred to as a stamper that embodies data in a digital form and is capable of being used to mold optical discs, and includes any other item, usually referred to as a master, father or mother, embodying data from which a stamper may be produced by means of an electroplating process.

(g) “Professional organization” means an organization whose membership consists wholly or substantially of intellectual property rights owners, and which is mandated by those members to enforce their rights against counterfeiting and piracy.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 421, Sec. 5.   (SB 550)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21803.

(a) Law enforcement officers are authorized to perform inspections at commercial optical disc manufacturing facilities to verify compliance with the provisions of this chapter. Any inspection shall be conducted by officers whose primary responsibilities include investigation of high-technology crime or intellectual property piracy. Inspections shall take place during regular business hours and shall be limited to the areas of the premises where manufacturing equipment is located and where optical discs and production parts are manufactured and stored. The scope of the inspection shall be restricted to the physical review of items and collection of information necessary to verify compliance with the provisions of this chapter. Officers performing inspections may do so
 without providing prior notice or obtaining a warrant, and shall have the authority to do all of the following:

(1) Take an inventory of all manufacturing equipment, including the identification mark or unique identifying code that any piece of equipment has been modified to apply.

(2) Review any optical disc, manufacturing equipment, optical disc mold, or production part.

(3) Review any record, book, or document maintained under Section 21807, kept in any format, electronic or otherwise, relating to the business concerned.

(4) Inspect, remove, and detain for the purpose of examination for as long as reasonably necessary any optical disc, production part, or record, book, or document maintained under Section 21807.

(5) Seize any optical disc or production part manufactured in violation of this chapter.

(6) Obtain and remove four samples each of the optical discs molded by each mold that has been used or could be used to manufacture optical discs.

(b) No person shall evade, obstruct, or refuse any inspection requested or being carried out by a law enforcement officer to determine compliance with this chapter. The manufacturer, and the employees, servants, or agents of the manufacturer, shall cooperate during the course of the inspection by promptly doing all of the following:

(1) Providing and explaining any record, book, or document required to be maintained pursuant to Section 21807.

(2) Pointing out
 and providing access to all optical discs, manufacturing equipment, optical disc molds, and production parts and demonstrating to the satisfaction of the officer that they include or have been adapted to apply the required identification mark or unique identifying code.

(3) Providing and permanently surrendering four samples each of the optical discs molded by each mold that has been used or could be used to manufacture optical discs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 421, Sec. 7.   (SB 550)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21804.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any manufacturer of optical discs who violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a first offense, and shall be subject to a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for a second or subsequent offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 550)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21805.

Any person who buys, sells, receives, transfers, or possesses for purposes of sale or rental an optical disc knowing that the identification mark required by this chapter has been removed, defaced, covered, altered, or destroyed, or knowing it was manufactured in California without the required identification mark, or knowing it was manufactured in California with a false identification mark is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 421, Sec. 9.   (SB 550)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21806.

Any person who knowingly removes, defaces, covers, alters, or destroys the identification mark required by this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 421, Sec. 10.   (SB 550)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21807.

(a) Every person who manufactures optical discs for commercial purposes shall keep full and accurate records of its manufacturing equipment, and shall make them available to law enforcement for inspection pursuant to this chapter. The records shall include a current inventory of manufacturing equipment, and every purchase, lease, sale, disposal, or other transaction relating to any manufacturing equipment, specifying the make, model, and serial number of the equipment, the identification mark or unique identifying code which the equipment has been adapted to apply, the date and nature of each transaction, and the full name and address of the party with whom the transaction was entered into.

(b) Every
 person who manufactures optical discs for commercial purposes shall keep all of the following, for a period of not less than five years from the date of production:

(1) One sample of each optical disc title manufactured by it.

(2) One copy in a retrievable form of the content of each production part manufactured by it.

(3) The name and physical address of the customer, or if the order was placed by an intermediary, the name and physical address of the actual customer who originated the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 421, Sec. 11.   (SB 550)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Precious Metal Marking [22100. - 22181.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [22100. - 22104.]

22100.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the general provisions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22101.

“Article” means any article of merchandise, and includes each and every portion of any such article whether or not such portion is separable or is a distinct part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22102.

“Mark” means any mark, sign, device, imprint, stamp or brand applied to any article or to any tag, card, paper, label, box, carton, container, holder, package cover or wrapping attached to, used in conjunction with or to inclose any article, or to any bill, bill of sale, invoice, statement, letter, circular, advertisement, notice, memorandum or other writing or printing concerning any article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22103.

“Apply,” “applies” or “applied” mean imprint, emboss or engrave on the article itself and not otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

22104.

“Person” includes a firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, and corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The Platinum Group [22120. - 22132.]

22120.

The provisions of this article shall apply exclusively to the following metals and to the alloys of each:

(a) Platinum

(b) Iridium

(c) Palladium

(d) Ruthenium

(e) Rhodium

(f) Osmium.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22121.

“Quality mark” is any mark describing, identifying or referring to or appearing or seeming or purporting to indicate, describe, identify or refer to the partial or total presence or existence of, or the quality of, or the percentage of, or the purity of, or the number of parts of platinum, iridium, palladium, ruthenium, rhodium or osmium in any article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22122.

No more than one quality mark shall be applied to any article and such quality mark shall be applied to such article in only one place thereof, except as otherwise in this article specifically permitted. Each quality mark shall be legible, clear and distinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22123.

If an article is composed of mechanism, works or movements and of a case or cover containing the mechanism, works or movements, a quality mark applied to the article shall not apply to the mechanism, works or movements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22124.

A quality mark applied to any article shall not apply to springs, winding bars, sleeves, crown cores, mechanical joint pins, screws, rivets, dustbands, detachable movement rims, hat-pin stems, bracelet or necklace snap tongues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22125.

If a quality mark is applied to an article in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (e) of Section 22128, it shall not apply to pin tongues, joints, catches, lapel button backs and posts to which they are attached, scarf-pin stems, hat-pin sockets, shirt-stud backs, vest-button backs and any screw backs, if such parts are made of the same quality of gold as that used in the balance of the article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22126.

If a quality mark is printed, stamped or branded on any article itself, the person so applying such mark shall also apply a trade-mark duly applied for or registered to him under the laws of the United States.

If the person so applying such quality mark is the manufacturer of the article and has sold or contracted to sell such article to a jobber, wholesale or retail dealer regularly engaged in the business of buying and selling similar articles, this section shall be deemed to be complied with if a trade-mark duly registered under the laws of the United States to such jobber, wholesale or retail dealer is applied to such article.

A manufacturer of an article may also mark on the article, in addition to the marks herein specifically required, numerals intended to identify the article or the design or pattern used in such article if such numerals do not appear or purport to be a part of the quality mark and are not calculated to mislead or deceive any person into believing that they are a part of the quality mark.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22127.

Wherever in this article provision is made for marking the number of parts or percentage of metals in any article such number or percentage shall refer to weight and not to volume, thickness or any other standard of measurement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22128.

No quality mark shall be applied to any article except in accordance with the following provisions of this section:

(a) An article consisting of at least 985/1000ths parts of platinum, iridium, palladium, ruthenium, rhodium, or osmium, where solder is not used and at least 950/1000ths parts of said metal or metals where solder is used, may be marked “platinum”; provided, that the total of the aforementioned metals other than pure platinum shall amount to no more than 50/1000ths parts of the contents of the entire article.

(b) An article consisting of at least 985/1000ths parts of platinum, iridium, palladium, ruthenium, or osmium, where solder is not used and at least 950/1000ths parts of the said metal or metals where solder is used; and provided further, that at least 750/1000ths parts of said article are pure platinum, may be marked “platinum”; provided immediately preceding the mark “platinum” there is marked the name or abbreviation of either iridium, palladium, ruthenium, rhodium, or osmium, whichever of said metals predominates; and provided further, that such predominating other metal must be more than 50/1000ths parts of the entire article.

(c) An article consisting of at least 985/1000ths parts of platinum, iridium, palladium, ruthenium, rhodium, or osmium, where solder is not used and at least 950/1000ths parts of said metals where solder is used; provided, more than 500/1000ths parts of said article consists of pure platinum, may be marked with the word “platinum”; provided, that said word is immediately preceded by a decimal fraction in one-thousandths showing the platinum content of the entire article; and further provided, that said mark “platinum” be followed by the name or abbreviation as herein allowed, of such one or more of the following metals, to wit: iridium, palladium, ruthenium, rhodium, or osmium, that may be present in the article in quantity of more than 50/1000ths parts of the entire article. The name of such other metal or metals other than platinum, however, shall each be immediately preceded by a decimal fraction in one-thousandths showing the content of such other metal or metals in proportion to the entire article, as for example, 600 plat., 350 pall., or 500 plat., 200 pall., 150 ruth., 100 rhod.

(d) An article consisting of 950/1000ths parts of the following metals: Platinum, iridium, palladium, ruthenium, rhodium, or osmium with less than 500/1000ths parts of the entire article consisting of pure platinum, may be marked with the name iridium, palladium, ruthenium, rhodium, or osmium, whichever predominates in the said article, but in no event with the mark “platinum”; provided, however, that the quantity of such metal other than platinum so marked, must be marked in decimal thousandths; and provided further, that the name of such metal other than platinum so used must be spelled out in full irrespective of any other provisions of this article to the contrary.

(e) An article composed of platinum and gold which resembles, appears or purports to be platinum, may be marked with a carat mark and the platinum mark; provided:

1. The platinum in such article shall be at least 985/1000ths parts pure platinum; and

2. The fineness of the gold in such article shall be correctly described by the carat mark of said gold; and

3. The percentage of platinum in such article shall be no less than 5 per cent in weight of the total weight of the article.

The mark shall be so applied that the carat mark shall immediately precede the platinum mark, as for example, “14 K & Plat.,” “l8 K & Plat.,” as the case may be. If the percentage of platinum exceeds 5 per cent, the quality mark may also include a declaration of the percentage of platinum, as for example, “18 K & l/10 Plat.,” or “14 K & l/8 Plat.,” or as the case may be.
